New Mexico, session 2026, HB276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.-- A. Three million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of New Mexico state university for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2028 for the New Mexico department of agriculture to: (1) develop projects, programs, promotions and educational and civic events to recognize the history, current value and future economic potential of the winemaking industry in New Mexico; (2) work with the department of transportation on the design, creation and installation of winery wayfinding signage and marking historical and cultural sites significant to New Mexico's winemaking history and industry; (3) work with the marketing excellence bureau of the marketing division of the tourism department on national marketing and advertising related to the four-hundredth anniversary of winemaking in America; and (4) continue funding an enologist on staff to support student education and success in future job opportunities within the New Mexico winemaking industry. B. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -